Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska53-112
Commissioners and executive director; compensation; expenses.

Each member of the commission shall receive an annual salary of not to exceed twelve thousand five hundred dollars, to be fixed by the Governor, payable monthly, and in addition expenses authorized in section 53-113 incurred on behalf of the commission. The salary of the executive director of the commission shall be fixed by the commission, payable monthly.

Laws 1935, c. 116, § 13, p. 382;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 53-313;

R.S.1943, § 53-112;

Laws 1951, c. 338, § 2, p. 1116;

Laws 1955, c. 200, § 1, p. 568;

Laws 1957, c. 227, § 1, p. 777;

Laws 1959, c. 339, § 1, p. 1222;

Laws 1967, c. 330, § 1, p. 876;

Laws 1969, c. 438, § 1, p. 1468;

Laws 1973, LB 111, § 2;

Laws 1974, LB 681, § 3;

Laws 1989, LB 780, § 5;

Laws 2020, LB381, § 44.

Cited in making comparison of powers and duties of Liquor Control Commission with those of heads of executive departments. State ex rel. Johnson v. Chase, 147 Neb. 758, 25 N.W.2d 1 (1946).